Tennessee, session 114, SB0450.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. This act is known and may be cited as the "Savannah Grace Copeland
Act."
SECTION 2. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 9-4-213, is amended by adding the
following new subsections:
(e) In the fiscal year beginning July 1, 2026, and in subsequent fiscal years, any
increase in funding for positions or office expenses for the department of children's
services in child protective services must be accompanied by an increase in funding of
seventy-five percent (75%) of the increase in funding to the contracts of the child
advocacy center in each judicial district for the purpose of services to child victims in
each fiscal year.
(f) Subject to appropriation, the department of children's services shall increase
each child advocacy center contract as follows:
(1) A contract labeled as "child advocacy center" must be increased to a
base of one hundred twenty-seven thousand eight hundred fifty-five dollars and
ninety-eight cents ($127,855.98); and
(2) A contract labeled as "forensic child interviewer" must be increased to
a base of eighty-five thousand dollars ($85,000) per contracted interviewer.
- 2 - 002086

(g) In the fiscal year beginning July 1, 2026, and in subsequent fiscal years,
funds appropriated for child advocacy centers must be allocated in accordance with the
formula in subsection (e) using the contract's applicable base in subsection (f).
SECTION 3. This act is not an appropriation of funds, and funds shall not be obligated
or expended pursuant to this act unless the funds are specifically appropriated by the general
appropriations act.
SECTION 4. This act takes effect July 1, 2025, the public welfare requiring it, and
applies to contracts entered into, renewed, or amended on or after such date.
- 3 - 002086